Utah statutes.
58-24b-504.   Reporting unlawful or unprofessional conduct -- Immunity -- Confidentiality.

(1)  A person who is aware that a person who is licensed under this chapter has violated a provision of this chapter, or a rule made pursuant to this chapter, shall report the violation to the division.

(2)  A person who makes a good faith report under Subsection (1) is immune from direct or derivative civil liability for making the report.

(3)  The division, the board, or a member of the division or the board, may not disclose the identity of a person who makes a report under this section, unless the disclosure is:

(a)  essential to the conduct of an investigation or hearing; or

(b)  ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

